es: Interfaz de montaje del brazo del platillo: Receptor de montaje para bombo; Parte superior del soporte de platillo (reemplaza la sección superior); Montaje de varilla en L; Montaje de abrazadera múltiple; Montaje de abrazadera de rack; Montaje de receptor de soporte (tubo inferior); Receptor de montaje para tom (receptor multipropósito); Otro
hr-HR: Sučelje za montažu ručice činele: Nosač za bas bubanj; Vrh stalka za činelu (zamjenjuje gornji dio); L-šipka nosač; Višestruki stezni nosač; Nosač sa stezaljkom za rack; Nosač za stalak (donja cijev); Nosač za tom (višenamjenski nosač); Ostalo
ja: シンバルアーム取り付けインターフェース: バスドラムマウントレシーバー; シンバルスタンドトップ (上部セクションと交換); Lロッドマウント; マルチクランプマウント; ラッククランプマウント; スタンドレシーバーマウント (ダウンチューブ); タムマウントレシーバー (多目的レシーバー); その他
da: Monteringsoverflade til bækkenarm: Stortromme-monteringsbeslag; Bækkenstativstop (erstatter øvre sektion); L-rod-montering; Multi-clamp-montering; Rack clamp-montering; Stativ-receiver-montering (nedrør); Tom-monteringsbeslag (multiformål-receiver); Andet
it: Interfaccia di montaggio del braccio del piatto: Supporto per grancassa; Parte superiore dell’asta del piatto (sostituisce la sezione superiore); Supporto con asta a L; Supporto con morsetto multiplo; Supporto con morsetto per rack; Supporto per ricevitore asta (tubo inferiore); Ricevitore per supporto tom (ricevitore multiuso); Altro
lt-LT: Lėkštės laikiklio montavimo sąsaja: Bosinio būgno laikiklio tvirtinimas; Lėkštės stovo viršus (pakeičia viršutinę dalį); L formos strypo laikiklis; Kelių gnybtų laikiklis; Rėmo gnybto laikiklis; Stovo tvirtinimas (apatinis vamzdis); Tomo tvirtinimas (daugiafunkcis tvirtinimas); Kita
ro-RO: Interfață de montare a brațului cinelului: Sistem de prindere pe toba mare; Vârf stativ de cinel (înlocuiește secțiunea superioară); Sistem de prindere tip tijă L; Prindere cu clemă multiplă; Prindere cu clemă pentru rack; Suport stativ (tub inferior); Suport pentru tom (suport multifuncțional); Altele
fr: Interface de montage du bras de cymbale: Récepteur de montage sur grosse caisse; Tête de pied de cymbale (remplace la section supérieure); Support en L; Support multi-pinces; Support de pince de rack; Récepteur de montage sur pied (tube inférieur); Récepteur de montage pour tom (récepteur polyvalent); Autre
nb: Monteringsgrensesnitt for cymbalarm: Feste til basstromme; Topp på cymbalstativ (erstatter øvre del); L-stangfeste; Multiklemme-feste; Rackklemme-feste; Stativfeste (nedrør); Tam-feste (flerbruksfeste); Annet
sk-SK: Montážne rozhranie ramena činela: Držiak na basový bubon; Horná časť stojana na činely (nahrádza hornú časť); Uchytenie na L-tyč; Viacúčelové upínacie rameno; Uchytenie na rampu; Uchytenie držiaka stojana (spodná trubica); Držiak na prechod (viacúčelový držiak); Iné
ko: 심벌 암 장착 인터페이스: 베이스 드럼 마운트 리시버; 심벌 스탠드 상단(상부 섹션 교체); L-로드 마운트; 멀티 클램프 마운트; 랙 클램프 마운트; 스탠드 리시버 마운트(다운 튜브); 탐 마운트 리시버(다목적 리시버); 기타
bg-BG: Интерфейс за монтаж на рамо за чинел: Стойка за бас каса; Горна част на стойка за чинел (замества горната секция); Г-образен държач; Мулти-клампа; Стойка за рак система; Монтаж към стойка (долна тръба); Държач за том (многофункционален); Други
sv: Monteringsgränssnitt för cymbalarm: Fäste för bastrumma; Topp för cymbalstativ (ersätter övre sektionen); L-fäste; Multiklämma; Rackklämma; Fäste för stativmottagare (nedre rör); Fäste för pukhållare (multifunktionsfäste); Annat
fi: Symbaalivarren kiinnitystapa: Bassorummun kiinnike; Symbaalitelineen yläosa (korvaa yläosan); L-tankokiinnike; Monitoimikiinnike; Telinepuristinkiinnike; Telineen kiinnike (alaputki); Tom-kiinnike (monitoimikiinnike); Muu
pt-BR: Interface de montagem do braço do címbalo/prato: Receptor de montagem para bumbo; Topo do suporte de prato (substitui a seção superior); Suporte L-rod; Suporte multiclamp; Suporte com grampo de rack; Suporte de receptor de estante (tubo inferior); Receptor de suporte de tom (receptor multiuso); Outros
el: Διεπαφή τοποθέτησης βραχίονα κυμβάλου: Υποδοχή βάσης κάσας; Κορυφή βάσης πιατινιού (αντικαθιστά το άνω τμήμα); Βάση L-rod; Βάση πολλαπλού σφιγκτήρα; Βάση σφιγκτήρα ικριώματος (rack); Βάση υποδοχής ορθοστάτη (κάτω σωλήνας); Υποδοχή βάσης τομ (υποδοχή πολλαπλών χρήσεων); Άλλο
pl: Interfejs mocowania ramienia talerza: Uchwyt w bębnie basowym; Szczyt statywu talerza (zastępuje górną sekcję); Uchwyt typu L-rod; Uchwyt typu multiclamp; Uchwyt na ramę; Gniazdo statywu (dolna rurka); Gniazdo tomu (gniazdo wielofunkcyjne); Inny
tr: Zil kolu montaj arabirimi: Bas davul bağlantı yuvası; Zil sehpası üstü (üst bölümün yerini alır); L çubuklu bağlantı; Çoklu kelepçe bağlantısı; Rack kelepçesi bağlantısı; Sehpa yuvası bağlantısı (alt boru); Tom bağlantı yuvası (çok amaçlı yuva); Diğer
nl: Bekkenarm montage-interface: Bassdrum-mountontvanger; Bovenkant bekkenstandaard (vervangt bovenste deel); L-rod-mount; Multi-clamp-mount; Rack-clamp-mount; Standaardontvanger (onderbuis); Tom-mountontvanger (multifunctionele ontvanger); Overig
pt-PT: Interface de montagem do braço do prato: Recetor de montagem do bombo; Topo do suporte de pratos (substitui a secção superior); Montagem de haste em L; Montagem com abraçadeira múltipla; Montagem com abraçadeira de rack; Montagem no recetor do suporte (tubo inferior); Recetor de montagem do timbalão (recetor polivalente); Outra
hu: Cintányérkar-rögzítő felület: Nagydob tartó foglalat; Cintányérállvány tető (a felső részt helyettesíti); L-vas rögzítés; Multibilincses rögzítés; Karám bilincses rögzítés; Állványfoglalatos rögzítés (alsó cső); Tamtartó aljzat (többcélú aljzat); Egyéb
zh-TW: 鈸臂安裝介面: 大鼓固定座接收器; 鈸架頂部 (取代上方部分); L 型桿固定座; 多功能夾固定座; 支架夾固定座; 支架接收器固定座 (下管); 中鼓固定座接收器 (多用途接收器); 其他
ru: Интерфейс крепления держателя тарелки: Крепление на бас-барабан; Верхняя часть стойки (заменяет верхнюю секцию); Г-образное крепление (L-rod); Универсальный зажим (мультикламп); Крепление на раму; Крепление в основание стойки (нижняя трубка); Крепление для тома (многоцелевое); Другое
de: Montageschnittstelle des Beckenarms: Bassdrum-Halterung; Beckenständer-Oberteil (ersetzt oberen Teil); L-Rod-Halterung; Multiklammer-Halterung; Rackklammer-Halterung; Stativ-Halterung (Unterrohr); Tom-Halterung (Mehrzweck-Halterung); Sonstige
vi: Giao diện gắn cần đỡ chũm chọe: Bộ nhận ngàm gắn trống trầm; Đầu chân đế chũm chọe (thay thế phần trên); Ngàm gắn thanh chữ L; Ngàm gắn kẹp đa năng; Ngàm gắn kẹp giá đỡ; Ngàm gắn bộ nhận chân đế (ống dưới); Bộ nhận ngàm gắn trống tom (bộ nhận đa năng); Khác
en: Cymbal arm mounting interface: Bass drum mount receiver; Cymbal stand top (replaces upper section); L-rod mount; Multi-clamp mount; Rack clamp mount; Stand receiver mount (down-tube); Tom mount receiver (multi-purpose receiver); Other
cs: Rozhraní pro montáž ramene činelu: Úchyt pro basový buben; Horní část stojanu činelu (nahrazuje horní díl); Úchyt typu L-rod; Multifunkční objímka (multi-clamp); Objímka pro rampu; Úchyt na stojan (spodní trubka); Úchyt na tom (víceúčelový úchyt); Jiné
th: รูปแบบข้อต่อสำหรับการติดตั้งแขนจับฉาบ: เมาท์ติดกลองกระเดื่อง; ท่อนบนขาตั้งฉาบ (แทนที่ส่วนบน); เมาท์ก้านแอล; เมาท์แคลมป์อเนกประสงค์; เมาท์แคลมป์แร็ค; เมาท์รับขาตั้ง (ท่อล่าง); ตัวรับเมาท์กลองทอม (ตัวรับอเนกประสงค์); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vmesnik za pritrditev stojala za činele: Sprejemnik za namestitev na bas boben; Vrh stojala za činele (nadomesti zgornji del); Nosilec L-rod; Nosilec z več objemkami (multi-clamp); Nosilec za objemko na kletki; Sprejemnik stojala (spodnja cev); Sprejemnik za namestitev toma (večnamenski); Drugo
zh-CN: 镲片支架臂安装接口: 低音鼓安装支座; 镲架顶部（替换上部）; L 型杆支架; 多重夹具支架; 机架夹具支架; 支架底座（下管）; 通鼓安装底座（多用途底座）; 其他